North Dakota, session 69, SB2377.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 26.1-47-02.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
26.1-47-02.1. Fees for dental services - Prohibition.
1. As used in this section, "covered services" means dental care services for which a
reimbursement is available under an enrollee's plan or for which a reimbursement would be
available but for the application of a deductible, copayment, coinsurance, waiting period,
annual or lifetime maximum, or frequency limitation.
2. Except for fees for covered services, a preferred provider arrangement for a dental plan may
not directly or indirectly set or otherwise regulate the fees charged by the preferred provider
for dental care services.
3. A preferred provider arrangement may not restrict a covered person from receiving or paying
for additional dental care services that were denied by the covered person's dental plan .
4. Unless disclosed to the covered person before receiving dental care, a covered person
receiving or paying for additional dental care services described in subsection 3 may not be
charged a rate in excess of the preferred provider arrangement's contracted rate for covered
services.

S. B. NO. 2377 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2377.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 1 Absent 3
House Vote: Yeas 92 Nays 0 Absent 2
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State